Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.090

Violation—Shop or business license and individual license required.

It is a violation of this chapter for any person to engage in the commercial practice of body art, body piercing, or tattooing except in a licensed shop or business with the appropriate individual body art, body piercing, or tattooing license.

[ 2009 c 412 s 10.]